Utah statutes.
31A-2-213.   Immunity.

(1) (a)  In the absence of actual malice, a person listed in Subsection (1)(b) is not subject to any civil liability for any cause of action arising out of any communication, written or oral, made to:

(i)  a law enforcement agency;

(ii)  a governmental authority; or

(iii)  the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. 

(b)  This section applies to:

(i)  the commissioner;

(ii)  an authorized representative of the commissioner;

(iii)  an examiner appointed by the commissioner; or

(iv)  any employee of the department.

(2)  This section is not intended to abrogate or modify in any way any common-law or statutory privilege or immunity enjoyed by any person.

